Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.245

Violations—Liability.

A licensed mortgage broker is liable for any conduct violating this chapter by the designated broker, a loan originator, or other licensed mortgage broker while employed or engaged by the licensed mortgage broker.

[ 1997 c 106 s 16; 1994 c 33 s 22; 1993 c 468 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.